Utah statutes.
73-4-14.   Pleadings -- Expert assistance for court.
The statements filed by the claimants shall stand in the place of pleadings,
and issues may be made thereon. Whenever requested so to do the state engineer
shall furnish the court with any information which he may possess, or copies
of any of the records of his office which relate to the water of said river
system or water source. The court may appoint referees, masters, engineers,
soil specialists or other persons as necessity or emergency may require to
assist in taking testimony or investigating facts, and in all proceedings for
the determination of the rights of claimants to the water of a river system or
water source the filed statements of claimants shall be competent evidence of
the facts stated therein unless the same are put in issue.
